Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB955.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4961(a) introductory paragraph of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4961. Authority to issue permits.(a) General rule.--The department and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may, upon application in writing showing good cause, issue special permits in writing, or as otherwise provided under subsection (a.1), authorizing the applicant to operate or move on specified highways any of the following:* * *(a.1) Electronic special permit.--Upon request by an applicant, the department or local authority shall issue the 123456789101112131415161718 special permit under subsection (a) electronically, subject to the following:(1) The electronic special permit must be: (i) Carried in the vehicle, combination or towing vehicle on an interactive mobile device.(ii) Open to inspection by a police officer, authorized agent of the issuing agency or any person having an accident involving the subject of the electronic permit.(2) If the applicant chooses an electronic special permit to be available on an interactive mobile device, a police officer shall be immune from civil or criminal liability if, in enforcing this chapter in good faith, the police officer inadvertently does any of the following:(i) Views materials on the device other than the electronic permit.(ii) Deletes information from the device.(iii) Intercepts a communication while in possession of the device.(iv) Causes breakage to the device.(3) If the interactive mobile device containing the electronic special permit is inaccessible for inspection by a police officer, the applicant shall, within five business days, provide a physical copy of the special permit to the police officer.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0955PN1029 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627